Massachusetts, session 194th, H1923.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the sixtieth clause and inserting in place
3 thereof the following clause:- Sixtieth, “Age of criminal majority” shall mean the age of “19.”
4 SECTION 2. Said clause of said section 7 of said chapter 4 is further amended by striking
5 out the number “19,” inserting in place thereof the following number:- “20”
6 SECTION 3. Said clause of said section 7 of said chapter 4 is further amended by striking
7 out the number “20,” and inserting in place thereof the following number:- “21”
8 SECTION 4. Section 167 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
9 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in all instances, the number “18” and
10 inserting in place thereof the following word:- “criminal majority”
1 of 18

11 SECTION 5. Section 20 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
12 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 10 the words “18 years” and inserting
13 in place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority.”
14 SECTION 6. Section 24 of chapter 37 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
15 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 14 the number “18” and inserting in
16 place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority.”
17 SECTION 7. Section 98F of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
18 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in clause (iv) of the last sentence, the words
19 “18 years of age” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the age of criminal
20 majority.
21 SECTION 8. Section 32H of chapter 94C, so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
22 out in the second paragraph, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the words “18 years of
23 age or older” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of
24 criminal majority.”
25 SECTION 9. Said section 32H of chapter 94C of the General Laws, so appearing, is
26 hereby amended by striking out in the second paragraph, as appearing in the 2022 Official
27 Edition, the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the words:- “the age of criminal
28 majority”
29 SECTION 10. Section 32M of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
30 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 1 the word “eighteen” and inserting in
31 place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority”
2 of 18

32 SECTION 11. Said section 32M of chapter 94C of the General Law is hereby further
33 amended by striking out in line 6 the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the following
34 words:- “criminal majority”
35 SECTION 12. Section 36 of chapter 94C of the General Law, as appearing in the 2022
36 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 6 the words “their eighteenth
37 birthday” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-“the age of criminal majority”
38 SECTION 13. Section 52 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
39 out, in the definition of “delinquent child”, the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the
40 following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
41 SECTION 14. Said section 52 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby further
42 amended by striking out, in the definition of “youthful offender,” the number “18” and inserting
43 in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
44 SECTION 15. Section 54 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
45 out, in the first paragraph, the words “18 years of age” and inserting in place thereof the
46 following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
47 SECTION 16. Said section 54 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby further
48 amended by striking out, in the second paragraph, the number “18” and inserting in place thereof
49 the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
50 SECTION 17. Section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
51 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words in lines 8 to 12, inclusive “that any
52 such probation may be imposed until such child reaches age eighteen or age nineteen in the case
3 of 18

53 of a child whose case is disposed of after he has attained his eighteenth birthday or age 20 in the
54 case of a child whose case is disposed of after he attains his nineteenth birthday”, and inserting in
55 place thereof the following words:- “that any such probation may, in the case of an offense that
56 occurred prior to the child’s eighteenth birthday, be imposed until such child reaches age 18 or
57 19 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after the child has attained the child’s
58 eighteenth birthday or age 20 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after the child
59 attains the child’s nineteenth birthday. In the case of an offense that occurred on or after the
60 child’s eighteenth birthday, such probation may be imposed until such child reaches age 19 or
61 age 20 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after the child has attained the child’s
62 nineteenth birthday, or age 21 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after the child
63 attains the child’s twentieth birthday.”
64 SECTION 18. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
65 amended by inserting after the words “after he attains his twentieth birthday”, in line 12, the
66 following words:- “or age 22 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after the child
67 attains the child’s twenty-first birthday”
68 SECTION 19. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
69 amended by inserting after the words “his twenty-first birthday”, in line 12, the following
70 words:- “or age 23 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after the child attains the
71 child’s twenty-second birthday”
72 SECTION 20. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
73 amended by inserting after the words “attains the age of eighteen”, in lines 26 to 27, inclusive,
4 of 18

74 the following words:- “in a case where the offense occurred prior to the child’s eighteenth
75 birthday.”
76 SECTION 21. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
77 amended by inserting after the words “nineteenth birthday”, in lines 29 to 30, inclusive, the
78 following words:- “In a case where the offense occurred on or after the child’s eighteenth
79 birthday, the probationary or commitment period shall not be for a period longer than until such
80 child attains the age of nineteen, or twenty in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after
81 such child has attained their nineteenth birthday, or twenty-one in the case of a child whose case
82 is disposed of after such child has attained their twentieth birthday.”
83 SECTION 22. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
84 amended by inserting after the words “ twentieth birthday” the following words:- “or twenty-two
85 in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after such child has attained their twenty-first
86 birthday.”
87 SECTION 23. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
88 amended by inserting after the words “twenty-first birthday”, the following words:- “or twenty-
89 two in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after they have attained their twenty-first
90 birthday, or twenty-three in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after they have attained
91 their twenty-second birthday.”
92 SECTION 24. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
93 amended by inserting after the words “twenty-one”, in line 38, the following words:- “in a case
94 where the offense occurred prior to the child’s eighteenth birthday, or until he reaches the age of
5 of 18

95 twenty- three in the case of a child whose offense occurred on or after the child’s eighteenth
96 birthday.”
97 SECTION 25. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
98 amended by inserting after the words “twenty-one”, in line 54, the following words:- “in a case
99 where the offense occurred prior to the child’s eighteenth birthday, or until they reach the age of
100 twenty-three in the case of a child whose offense occurred on or after the child’s eighteenth
101 birthday”
102 SECTION 26. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
103 amended by inserting after the words “juvenile court probation department until the age of
104 twenty-one”, in line 48, the following words:- “in a case where the offense occurred prior to the
105 child’s eighteenth birthday, or until the age of twenty-three in the case of a child whose offense
106 occurred on or after the child’s eighteenth birthday.”
107 SECTION 27. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
108 amended by inserting after the words “twenty-one”, in line 54, the following words:- “in a case
109 where the offense occurred prior to the child’s eighteenth birthday, or until they reach the age of
110 twenty-three in the case of a child whose offense occurred on or after the child’s eighteenth
111 birthday”
112 SECTION 28. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
113 amended by striking out the word “eighteenth”, in line 79, and inserting in place thereof the
114 following words:- “twenty-first”
115 SECTION 29. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
116 2020 Official Edition, is hereby further amended by striking out the words “the Massachusetts
6 of 18

117 Correctional Institution, Cedar Junction, prior to his eighteenth birthday”, in lines 78 to 79, and
118 inserting in place thereof the following words:-
119 “any prison owned, operated, administered or subject to the control of the department of
120 correction including, but not limited to: Massachusetts Correctional Institution, Cedar Junction;
121 Massachusetts Correctional Institution, Norfolk; Massachusetts Correctional Institution,
122 Concord; Massachusetts Correctional Institution, Framingham; Massachusetts Correctional
123 Institution, Bridgewater; Massachusetts Correctional Institution, Plymouth; Massachusetts
124 Correctional Institution, Warwick; and Massachusetts Correctional Institution, Monroe, prior to
125 his twenty-first birthday.”
126 SECTION 30. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
127 amended by striking out the words “until such child attains his eighteenth birthday or his
128 nineteenth birthday in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after he has attained his
129 eighteenth birthday”, in lines 97 to 99, inclusive, and inserting the following words:- “until such
130 child attains their nineteenth birthday or their twentieth birthday in the case of a child whose case
131 is disposed of after they have attained their nineteenth birthday”
132 SECTION 31. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
133 amended by striking out the words “ until such child attains his nineteenth birthday or his
134 twentieth birthday in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after he has attained his
135 nineteenth birthday”, in lines 97 to 99, inclusive, and inserting the following words:- “until such
136 child attains their twentieth birthday or their twenty-first birthday in the case of a child whose
137 case is disposed of after they have attained their twentieth birthday”
7 of 18

138 SECTION 32. Said section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
139 amended by striking out the words“ until such child attains his twentieth birthday or his twenty-
140 first birthday in the case of a child whose case is disposed of after he has attained his twentieth
141 birthday”, in lines 97 to 99, inclusive, and inserting the following words:- “until such child
142 attains their twenty-first or their twenty-second birthday in the case of a child whose case is
143 disposed of after they have attained their twenty-first birthday”
144 SECTION 33. Section 60A of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
145 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 17 the words “ eighteenth birthdays”
146 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
147 SECTION 34. Said section 60A of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
148 amended by striking out in line 20 the words, “been age 18 older” and inserting in place thereof
149 the following words:- “attained the age of criminal majority”
150 SECTION 35. Said section 60A of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
151 amended by striking out in line 22 the number, “were age 18 or older” where it so appears and
152 inserting in place thereof the following number:- “attained the age of criminal majority”
153 SECTION 36. Section 63A of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
154 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 1 the words “is 19 years of age” and
155 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “attained the age of criminal majority”
156 SECTION 37. Said section 63A of chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
157 amended by striking out in line 2 the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the following
158 number:- “criminal majority”
8 of 18

159 SECTION 38. Section 65 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
160 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 2 the words “18 years of age” and
161 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
162 SECTION 39. Section 66 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
163 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 3 and 5 the words “18 years of age”
164 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
165 SECTION 40. Section 67 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
166 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in subsection (a), subsection (b), and
167 subsection (d) as amended by section 76 of chapter 69 of the Acts of 2020, the words “18 years
168 of age” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
169 SECTION 41. Chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out in section
170 68 as amended by section 77 of chapter 69 of the Acts of 2018, the number “18” and inserting in
171 place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority”
172 SECTION 42. Chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out in section
173 68 as amended by section 77 of chapter 69 of the Acts of 2018, the words “18 years of age” and
174 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
175 SECTION 43. Chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out in section
176 68A as amended by section 77 of chapter 69 of the Acts of 2018, the words “18 years of age”
177 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
9 of 18

178 SECTION 44. Section 70 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
179 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 2 the words “18 years of age”
180 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
181 SECTION 45. Section 72 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
182 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 2 through 3, inclusive, the
183 words “their eighteenth birthday” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of
184 criminal majority”
185 SECTION 46. Said section 72 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
186 amended by striking out in line 9 the word “ twentieth” and inserting in place thereof the
187 following words:-“twenty-first”
188 SECTION 47. Said section 72 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
189 amended by striking out the word “twenty-first” in line 9 and inserting in place thereof the
190 following words:- “twenty-second”
191 SECTION 48. Said section 72 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
192 amended by striking out the word “twenty-second” and inserting in place thereof the following
193 words:- “twenty-third”
194 SECTION 49. Said section 72 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
195 amended by striking out, in lines 10 to 13, inclusive, the words “ prior to his eighteenth birthday,
196 and is not apprehended until between such child’s eighteenth and nineteenth birthday, the court
197 shall deal with such child in the same manner as if he has not attained his eighteenth birthday and
198 all provisions and rights applicable to a child under 18 shall apply to such child.” and inserting in
199 place thereof the following:-
10 of 18

200 “prior to attaining the age of criminal majority, and is not apprehended until between
201 such child’s attainment of the age of criminal majority and the subsequent birthday, the court
202 shall deal with such child in the same manner as if they have not attained the age of criminal
203 majority and all provisions and rights applicable to a child under 18 shall apply to such child.”
204 SECTION 50. Subsection (b) of section 72 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as
205 appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “their
206 eighteenth birthday”, in line 18, and inserting in place thereof the following words:-the age of
207 criminal majority
208 SECTION 51. Section 72 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
209 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word “twenty-first”, in line 25, and
210 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “twenty-third”
211 SECTION 52. Section 72A of said chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
212 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 2 to 3 inclusive, the words “his
213 eighteenth birthday, and is not apprehended until after his nineteenth birthday,” and inserting in
214 place thereof the following:-
215 “attaining the age of criminal majority, and is not apprehended until after their
216 subsequent birthday”
217 SECTION 53. Section 72B of said chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
218 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in all instances, the words “his
219 eighteenth birthday” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “attaining the age of
220 criminal majority”
11 of 18

221 SECTION 54. Section 74 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
222 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 3 through 4, inclusive, the
223 words “his eighteenth birthday” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-“attaining the
224 age of criminal majority”
225 SECTION 55. Said section 74 of said chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby further
226 amended by striking out in lines 10 and 14 the words “18 years of age” and inserting in place
227 thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
228 SECTION 56. Section 84 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
229 striking out in the first paragraph as amended by section 78 of chapter 69 of the Acts of 2018, the
230 words“eighteen (or nineteen) years of age” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
231 “the age of criminal majority (or one year older)”
232 SECTION 57. Section 86 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
233 out in the definition of “Juvenile” of subsection (a) as amended by section 80 of chapter 69 of the
234 Acts of 2018, the number “21” and inserting in place thereof the following number:- “23”
235 SECTION 58. Section 89 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
236 out in the definition of “Juvenile” of subsection (a) as amended by section 80 of chapter 69 of the
237 Acts of 2018, the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “criminal
238 majority”
239 SECTION 59. Section 89 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
240 out in the definition of “Juvenile” of subsection (a) as amended by section 80 of chapter 69 of the
241 Acts of 2018, the number “22” and inserting in place thereof the following number:- “23”
12 of 18

242 SECTION 60. Section 15 of chapter 120 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
243 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 3 and 4 the number “18” and
244 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
245 SECTION 61. Section 21 of chapter 120 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
246 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 6, 9, and 10 the word “conviction”
247 and inserting in place thereof the following word:- “adjudication”
248 SECTION 62. Said section 21 of said chapter 120 of the General Laws, as appearing in
249 the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 17 the words “18 years of
250 age” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “the age of criminal majority”
251 SECTION 63. Section 2A of chapter 211D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
252 hereby amended by striking out in subsection (f) as amended by section 107 of chapter 69 of the
253 Acts of 2018, the words “18 years of age” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
254 “the age of criminal majority”
255 SECTION 64. Section 13 of chapter 250 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
256 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 3 the number “18” and inserting in
257 place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority”
258 SECTION 65. Section 2 of chapter 258E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
259 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 7 the number “18” and inserting in
260 place thereof the following words:-“criminal majority”
13 of 18

261 SECTION 66. Section 15A of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
262 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 24 the words “18 years of age” and
263 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal majority”
264 SECTION 67. Section 15A of said chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
265 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 46 the words “is 18 years of age
266 or over” and inserting in place thereof the words:- “has attained the age of criminal
267 responsibility”
268 SECTION 68. Section 15B of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
269 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 24 the words “ 18 years of age or
270 over” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- who has attained the age of criminal
271 majority
272 SECTION 69. Section 18 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
273 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 26 the number “18 years of over” and
274 inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal majority”
275 SECTION 70. Section 18B of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
276 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 43 the words “18 years of age or over”
277 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal
278 majority”
279 SECTION 71. Section 19 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
280 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 23 the words “18 years of age or over”
281 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal
282 majority”
14 of 18

283 SECTION 72. Section 43 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
284 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 56 and 89 the words “18 years of age
285 or over” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of
286 criminal majority”
287 SECTION 73. Section 59 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as added by section 132 of
288 chapter 69 of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by striking out the number “18” and inserting
289 in place thereof the following words:-“criminal majority”
290 SECTION 74. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
291 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 53 the words “18 years of age or
292 older” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal
293 majority”
294 SECTION 75. Said section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby further
295 amended by striking in line 55 the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the words:- “the
296 age of criminal majority”
297 SECTION 76. Said section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby further
298 amended by striking out in lines 223 and 225 the words “18 years of age or over” and inserting
299 in place thereof the words:- “who has attained the age of criminal majority”
300 SECTION 77. Section 10E of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
301 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 40 through 41, inclusive, the words
302 “18 years of age or older” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained
303 the age of criminal majority”
15 of 18

304 SECTION 78. Section 10E of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
305 Official Edition, is hereby further amended by striking out in line 42 the number “18” and
306 inserting in place thereof the words:- “the age of criminal majority”
307 SECTION 79. Section 10F of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
308 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 4 and 28 the words “18 years of age
309 or over” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of
310 criminal majority”
311 SECTION 80. Said section 10F of chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby further
312 amended by striking out in line 32 the number “18” and inserting in place thereof the following
313 words:- “criminal majority”
314 SECTION 81. Said section 10F of chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby further
315 amended by striking out in line 50 the words “17 years of age or over” and inserting in place
316 thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal majority”
317 SECTION 82. Section 10G of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
318 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 34 the words “18 years of age or over”
319 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “who has attained the age of criminal
320 majority”
321 SECTION 83. Section 87 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
322 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 7 the number “18” and inserting in
323 place thereof the following words:-“criminal majority”
16 of 18

324 SECTION 84. Said section 87 of chapter 276 of the General Laws is hereby further
325 amended by striking out in lines 14 and 15, inclusive, the words “was eighteen years of age or
326 older” and inserting in place thereof the words:- “had attained the age of criminal majority”
327 SECTION 85. Section 89A of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
328 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 3 the number “18” and inserting in
329 place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority”
330 SECTION 86. Section 89B of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as added by section 183
331 of chapter 69 of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by striking out the words “are 18 to 24”
332 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “attained the age of criminal majority and
333 are under 25”
334 SECTION 87. Section 100D of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
335 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 8 the number “17” and inserting
336 in place thereof the following words:- “criminal majority”
337 SECTION 88. Section 6B of chapter 280 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
338 amended by striking out in the first paragraph as amended by section 209 of chapter 69 of the
339 Acts of 2018, the words “18 years” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “criminal
340 majority”
341 SECTION 89. Sections 1, 30, and 46 are hereby repealed.
342 SECTION 90. Section 89 shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
343 SECTION 91. Sections 2, 31, and 47 shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
344 SECTION 92. Sections 18 and 22, shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
17 of 18

345 SECTION 93. Section 91 is hereby repealed.
346 SECTION 94. Section 93 shall take effect on July 1, 2030.
347 SECTION 95. Sections 3, 19, 23, 32, and 48 shall take effect on July 1, 2030.
18 of 18